Idaho, session 2025, H0013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-666, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-666. MOTORCYCLE, MOTORBIKE, UTV AND ATV SAFETY HELMETS AND SEAT-
BELTS -- REQUIREMENTS AND STANDARDS. (1) No person under eighteen (18) years
of age shall ride upon or be permitted to operate a motorcycle, motorbike,
utility type vehicle or an all-terrain vehicle unless at all times when so
operating or riding upon the vehicle he is wearing, as part of his motorcy-
cle, motorbike, UTV or ATV equipment, a protective safety helmet of a type
and quality equal to or better than the standards established for helmets
by the director, except the. The provisions of this section shall not apply
when such vehicles are operated or ridden on private property, or when are
used as an implement of husbandry, and. The provisions of this section shall
also not apply to completely enclosed autocycles or to UTVs that are equipped
with a roll cage and seat belts.
(2) Except as provided in section 49-672, Idaho Code, any operator or
passenger in a UTV equipped with safety restraints who is sixteen (16) years
of age or younger shall wear a safety restraint that is properly fastened
about such operator's or passenger's body at all times while the vehicle is
in motion.
(3) A citation may be issued to any occupant of a UTV who is sixteen (16)
years of age or younger and who fails to wear a safety restraint while such
vehicle is in motion pursuant to the requirements of subsection (2) of this
section.
(4) A citation may be issued to any person who operates a UTV if any oc-
cupant of such UTV who is sixteen (16) years of age or younger fails to wear
a safety restraint while such vehicle is in motion pursuant to the require-
ments of subsection (2) of this section.
(5) A person who is issued a citation pursuant to this section shall be
subject to a fine of fifty dollars ($50.00). A conviction under this section
shall not result in violation point counts pursuant to section 49-326, Idaho
Code, nor shall such a conviction be deemed to be a moving traffic violation
for the purposes of establishing rates of motor vehicle insurance charged by
a casualty insurer.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.